Louisiana, session 2026, HB1258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:126.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§126.1. Disposition of wildlife seized for unlawful possession; euthanasia
A. This Section shall be applicable to any wildlife held in violation of R.S.
56:126 that is seized by the department for unlawful possession. For purposes of this
Section, wildlife seized by the department shall be referred to as "contraband
wildlife".
B. Contraband wildlife shall be evaluated by department field staff or by a
veterinarian to determine the appropriate disposition.
C. The department shall dispose of contraband wildlife in accordance with
the following order of preference:
(1) If the contraband wildlife is clinically healthy, past the age of
independence, and release of the species into the wild is not prohibited by law or
regulation, the department shall release the wildlife into a suitable habitat.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1258 ENROLLED
(2) If the contraband wildlife is sick, injured, or otherwise not immediately
releasable, but is capable of being rehabilitated, the department shall place the
wildlife with a wildlife rehabilitator permitted by the department who is authorized
to possess the species and who is willing to accept the wildlife. Wildlife placed with
a rehabilitator shall remain in the rehabilitator's possession until it can be released
to the wild or until the rehabilitator, in consultation with the department, determines
that further rehabilitation is not feasible. A rehabilitator shall notify the department
prior to euthanizing any wildlife placed in his care pursuant to this Paragraph.
(3) If the contraband wildlife is medically nonreleasable or is determined to
be nonreleasable due to habituation to life in captivity or rehabilitation would pose
a risk to public health or be deemed inappropriate due to an animal's temperament
and risk of injury to the animal or humans, the department shall make every
reasonable effort to place the wildlife with a zoo, aquarium, sanctuary, educational
institution as appropriate, or other facility that is licensed or otherwise authorized to
possess the species under state or federal law.
(4) Euthanization of contraband wildlife shall only be performed as a last
resort. The department may euthanize contraband wildlife only if one or more of the
following applies:
(a) None of the preferred options provided in this Subsection is viable or
available for the wildlife.
(b) The wildlife exhibits clinical signs of disease.
(c) The wildlife has sustained a life-threatening injury.
(d) Release or rehabilitation of the species is prohibited by law or regulation
and no licensed facility described in Paragraph (C)(3) of this Section is willing,
authorized, or appropriate to accept the wildlife.
(e) The state wildlife veterinarian, or Department of Wildlife and Fisheries
departmental veterinarian has determined that euthanasia is in the best interest of the
animal.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1258 ENROLLED
D. Any euthanasia performed pursuant to this Section shall be conducted in
accordance with the most current edition of the American Veterinary Medical
Association: Guidelines for the Euthanasia of Animals.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.